ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/hu_HU/hyph_hu_HU.dic
in1ge
i1ny
ind1at
in2d1ez
in1de
in2dö
i2n1ol
i1no
1inf
i1ó1b
i1ó1h
i1ót
i1ók
i1ór
i1ón
i1ói
i1ó1é
i1ós
i1ó1v
i1ó1j
i1la
il1ágy
i1lá
il9ly/ly=,2,1
i2ll
i2les
i1le
i1li
i1lé
i1eg
i1et
i1ek
i1em
ie3melke2d1t
iemel1k
iemel1ke
i1er
i1ed
i1en
i1el
ie3légí1ti
ielé1gí
i1ei
i1es
i1i
io1g
i1ot
i1ok
i1om
i1or
i1os
i1c
i2c1k
i2cz
i1é
ié2g
ié3pítet
i1épí
iépí1te
i1sa
is1al
is1as
1is1m
i1se
i1si1
i1so
i1sza
i1sze
i1sző
i1szü
i1sü
i1za
1iz1g
i1zá
i1zó
i1ze
ize2n1
i1zi
i1zo
i2zom
i1zé
iz2s
i1zsi
i1zu
i1zű
i1ja
i1já
i1ju
i1u
iu2t
iu3tat
iu1ta
i2pa
i1pá
i1pó
i1pi
i1ú
i1ü2
i1í
i1ö
i1ű
o1a
o2b1r
o1ga
o1gya
o1gyi
o1gá
o2g1e
o1gi
o2g1or
o1go
o1gé
o1gí
o1yo
o1ty
o2t1r
o1tí
o1á
o1ki2
ok1i1r
o2k1old
o1ko
o1má
ome2
o1m1e2g
o1m1ez
o1mi
om1é1v
o1mé
o1ra
o2r1a1d
o1rá
o1ró
o1ri
or1ing
o2r1i1v
o1ro
o1ré
o1ru
od1r
o1dó
o1nya
o1nyá
o1nyi
on2t1e
on1da
on1e1g
o1ne
on1c2s
on1sz
on1ze
on1ö
ol1ad
ola2s
1olaj
o1li
o2l1ot
o1lo
o2l1or
ol1é
o1lu
o1lú
oe3t2
o1en
o1or
o1c2s
o1é
o1sa
o2s1á2g
o1sá
o1só
o1se
o1si
o1so
o3son2t.
o1sza
o1sze
o1szi
o2sz1é
o1szu
os3p
o1sú
o3vo
o1v
o1za
o1zá
o1zó
o1z1e
o1zi
o1zo
o1zé
o1zu
o1zí
o1já
o1pá
op1r
o1pó
o2pe
o1we
2c.
1ca
ca2e3
c1b
c2h
c3het
c1g
c1ti1
1cá
c1k
c3ku
2cr
c1ra
c1ró
c1ro3
c1n
c1ne1
1ce
2ceg
ce1gé
ce3l1o
2c1ez
1ci
ci1on
2ciz
1co
co1d
1cé
cé1lu
c2s
2c2s.
1cs2a.
cs1ad
2cs3h
1csy
2cst
3c1sá
2cs1k
2cs1m
1csó
2cs1l
1cse
cse2h
1csi
1cso
c2s3s
2c3sz
1c1su
1csü
1csö
1czy
1cu
1cí
cí2ma
cí1ze
c1ö2t
1cök
2é.
é1b
1é2br
é2b1i
é1ga
é1gyet
é1gyen
é1gyes
1égtek
ég1t2
ég1te
1ég1ni
é2g1n
é2g1ó2
é2ge2r
é1ge
ég1e1re
é1gi
é1gé
é2g1ér1v
égve1
é2g1v
1ég1j
é1gü
é1gí
é2t1ág
é1tá
é2t1ir
é1ti
é2t1o
é2k1ad
é1ka
é2k1aj
éke2v
é1ke
é1ma1
é1má
é1me
é1mi
é1ra
é1r1ál
2ér1r
1éred
é1re
é1ria
ér1ig
ér1o
ér2c2h
é1ré
ér2va
ér1v
é1rő
éd1or
é1do
é3dé
é1dz2
é1dő
é1nye
é1nyi
é2nyé2rt
é1nyé
én9ny/ny=,2,1
én2z1i
é2la
é1l1am
é1lye
é1li
élé2v
él1é2v.
él1évé
él1u2t2
él1ú2t
é1i1h
é1ig
é1it
é1im
é1o
é1c2h
é1é
é1se
é1si
és3szi
é2ss
és2sz/sz=,2,1
é1szá
é1sze
é1szi
é1szü
é1ső
és3p
é1sü
é2s1üg
é1sű
1é2v1b
é1v
é3vel
é2ves
év1ez
1é2vi
é2vú
é1zó
é1ze
é1zi
é2z1ir
é1zé
é1zu
é1ző
é1zü
é1f
é1pá
ép1l
ép1ir
é2p1is
1épül
1épí
é4pí1té
é1ü
2s.
sa2ki
sam1
sa1rá
sa2dá
sa3nyjá
sany1j
sa1la
sa1u
2s1b
s2hi
s1h
s3hit
s1g
s1ty
ste2i
s1te
s2t1in
s1ti
s2t1őr
s1tő
st1í1v
1sá
sá1ga
sá2ri
sá1sz
s1k
s1m
2s1r
2sd
s1da
s1n
s1l
1seb
se1g
s1egy
2se2t1r
se3to
se1me
1sed
se1li
se1lé
se1se
si1r
1sie
si2em
so1da
s1c2s
1sé
sé1ri
2sé1sé
s1sa
s1se
s1si1
s1so
ssz1in
s1sú
s1sü
s1sö
svi1
s1v
2s2z.
sz1adó
2sz1h
2s2z1t
1szál
2sz1k
2sz1r
2sz1n
1szó
1szit
1szok
1szos
1szo1v
1szé
1szül
1szí
1szö
s1j
1su
2s1f
ső1ér
ső1s
s2p
s3pá
sp1l
spi1
s3pö
sú1n
1súl
sú1szi
sú1szo
2süg
sü3t
sü4t1j
1sí
2sír
sí1ro
2s1w
1v
2v.
va1rá
va1ro
va1da
v1adó
va1la1
va1lu
va1c
va1zo
2v1b
2v1h
2v1t
vá1ga
vá1gya
vá1gyi
vá2t1or
vá1to
vá1ru
2v1k
2v1m
2v1r
2vd
2v1n
2v1l
ve1gy
ve1rő
ve1li
ve1lé
ve1lü
ve1se
ve1sze
ve1szü
ve1zü
vi1g
vi1rá
vi1sz
2vok
vé2rá
vé1ri
vé2do
vé1nyű
2v1s
2v1v
2v1j
v1je2
2v1f
vfo1l
v1fo
v1ú2t
2v1üg
ví1r
ví1ze
vö1r
vö1zi
2z.
za2ki2
za3kit
za2ké
z1ará
za1dó.
za1ny
za2né
za1la
z1az
za1u
z1b
z1g
2z1t
z2t1r
zte2re
z1te
zá1ga
zá2r1at
zá1ra
1zá1ró
zá1ru
z1k
z1m
z1me3g
z1r
z1da
z1dő
z1n
z1l
zla1j
z2lá1v
z1lá
zle2t3em
z1le
zle1te
2ze1g2é
ze2t1el
ze1te
ze2ma
ze1me
ze1mi
ze3rá
ze1li
ze1lé
ze1lü
ze1se
ze1si
ze1sze
z1e1ze
ze1zo
ze1u
2zir
zi2lág
zi1lá
zi1o
2zo2k1h
z1or1s
zo2n1á
zo2ne
z1c
zé1g
zé1ny
2zél
z1élet
zé1le
zé1lé
2z2s.
2zs1n
1zso
z1sz
1z2su
2z2s1f
zs3p
z3zé
z1j
z1ut
z2fé
ző1r
ző1s
z1pá
zp1r
z1ú1to
zú2t
z1üg
zü1lü
2z1üz
zí1r
zí2na
zí1j
zö2t
2j.
ja1dó
ja1la
1jas
1jaz
ja1zo
ja1p
2j1b
2j1h
j1g
2jt
1já1h
1ját
já1ru
3jánlot1tu
ján1l
ján1lo
2jk
j1ka1
j1m
j1r
2j1d
2j1n
1jó
jó2le
2j1l
1je
je1gye
je1gyé
je1se
1ji
1jo
jo2n
2jc
1jé
jé2g1
2j1é2r.
2j1s
j1zi
j1zo
2j1j
jjá1
1ju2lt
j1f
j1p
jú1j
1jü
1jö
1jű
u1al
u1ga
u1gá
1ug1r
ugo1s
u1go
u3t2a.
u1ta
u1ty
ute1s
u1te
u3ti
u1á
u1má
u1me
u1mi
u1mú
u1ró
u1ri
u1da
u1dó
ud2s
u1nya
un1s
u1ó
u1la
u1ly
u1li
u1lé
ul2s
u1lu
u1en
u1el
u1it
u1id
u1in
u1sa
u1si
u1so
u1sza
u1szi
u1sú
u1za
u1zo
u1z2s
u1zu
u1zí
u1ja
u1já
u1pá
up1l
u1pi
u1x
2f.
1fa
fa1gy
fa2r1i
fa1d
fa1la
fa1lu
fa1c
fa1s
fa1z
fa2j2d1
2ft
1fá
frá1
fri1g
2f1n
1fó1
f2l
1fe
fe1gye
fe1ny
fe3n2e
fe2l1e2g
fe1le
fe2l1em
fel1ég
fe2l1ék
fe1lém
fe3lé1re
fe1léd
fe1lén
fe1léj
fe1lő
fe1l3ü2l.
fe2l1ö
fe1sze
fe1u
2fi
fi1g
fin2
1fo
fo1gy
1fé
fé1rá
fé1lén
fél1é2v
fé1lő
1fu
2f2f
fő1n
1fú
1fü
fü1l
fü1z
1fí
1fö
1fű
ő1bí1
ő1gö
ő1ág
ő1me
ő1re1
ő1ro
ő1ré
1őr1s
ő1rő
őr1ö1v
ő1dő
ő1nö
ő1lé
ő1lő
ő1lü
ő1e
őe1l
ő1ig
ő1it
ő1ik
ő1in
ő1i1v
ő1c
ős1a1p
ős3h
ő1si
ő1so
ő1sö
ő1ze
ő1zi
ő1zé
ő1ző
ő1zü
ő1zö
ő1j
ő1je1
ő1f
ő1p
ő1ü
ő1í
1pa
pa2te
pa1rán
pa3ne
pa1la
pa3le
p1b
1p2hi
p1h
p1g
1py
p1t
pá2t1
1pá1l
1pás
p1k
p1m
p1ra
p1ru
p1rő
p1rö
p1d
p1n
1pól
ple3n
p1le
p1li
p3lo
p1lő
1pe
pe1c
pe1se
1pi.
pi1ra
pi2re.
pi1re
pi1ri
2pis
1po
po1da
p1c
1pé
pé1ly
pé1sz
p1so
p1sza
p1szá
p1sze
p1sü
p1z
p1j
1pu
pu1r
p1f
1pő
p1pá
p1pr
p2p1ol
p1po
p1úg
1pük
1pün
pí1ro
1pö
2ú.
ú1a
ú1b
úgy1
ú1gá
ú2t
ú3tá
ú2t1r
ú1á
ú1ra
ú1rá
ú2rál
ú1ró
úr1is
ú1la
ú1lya
ú2l1á2
ú1li
úl1é2
ú1ik
ú1im
ú1in
ú1csa
úc2s
ú1é
ú1so
ú1sza
úsze2
ú1za
ú1zá
ú1zó
ú1ze
ú1zi
ú1zo
ú1já
ú1f
ü1b
ü1gé
ü2t
üt2t1é
ü3tá
ü3ti
ü3té
ü1m
ü1rü1
ün1c
ü1ly
ü2l1á2
ü1li
ü1lé
ü1lő
ü1szi
ü1zé
ü1j
ü1f
ü1p
í1b
í1ga
í1gy
ígé1ri
íta1l
í1ta
í3tő
ím1ad
í1ma
í1me
ír1ad
ír1eg
í1re
í1ri
ír1or
íré2
ír1ég
í2r1üg
í1rü
íd1r
ín1a2r
í1na
í1ny
ín1s
í1li
í1lu
í1c
í1s
íz1a2l
í1zá
í1zó
í1zo
ízé2
í1zu
í1p
ö1bé
ö1gi
ö2g1o
ö1gé
ö1gü
ö1gö
ö2t1r
öt1e2z
ö1te
öt1é1v
ö1té
ök1l
ö2ko
ök1or
ök1ér1v
ö1ké
ö1me
öme3ge
ö1me2g
ö1ri
ö1ré
ö1rő
ö2r1ú
ö1dő
ö2n1á
ön9ny/ny=,2,1
ön1el
ö1ne
ön1é2l
ö1né
ön1z
ö1nö
öl2d1a2
ö4le1ti
ö1le
ö1lé
öl2s
öc1sé2
öc2s
öcs1ét
ö1se
ö1sü
ö1sö
öz1a2
ö1ze
öze2g
ö2z1e1g2é
ö2z1em
ö1zi.
öz1ig
ö1zik
ö1zil
öz1o
ö1zé
ö2z1é2l
ö1ző
öz1ú
ö1zü
ö1zí
ö1zö
öp1r
ö1pí
ű1g
ű1k
ű1ri
ű1ré
ű1rő
ű1rö
ű1nö
ű1li
ű1lé
ű1e
ű1s
űz1á
űz1o
űz3f
wa2r
wa1s
w1t
we2bo
we2s2t1
1xa
x1b
xt1
xk1
x1r
1xe
xi1g
xi1m
x1c
1xu
x1f
